test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv18_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    brúður+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: brúður
    brúður+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: brúður
    brúður+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: brúður
    brúður+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: brúðar
    brúður+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: brúðrar
    brúður+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: brúðrum
    brúður+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: brúðra
    brúður+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: brúðurin
    brúður+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: brúðrina
    brúður+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: brúðrini
    brúður+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: [brúðarinnar, brúðrarinnar]
    brúður+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: brúðrarnar
    brúður+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: brúðrunum
    brúður+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: brúðranna
